Massachusetts, session 194th, HD4909.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. To provide for certain unanticipated obligations of the commonwealth, to
provide for an alteration of purpose for current appropriations and to meet certain requirements
of law, the sums set forth in this act are hereby appropriated from the General Fund unless
specifically designated otherwise in this section, for the several purposes and subject to the
conditions specified in this act, and subject to the laws regulating the disbursement of public
funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026. Except as otherwise stated, these sums shall be
made available through the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027.
SECTION 2.
of 3

EXECUTIVE OFFICE FOR ADMINISTRATION AND FINANCE
Office of the Secretary
XXXX-XXXX For the Fall River fire station infrastructure and remediation
improvement program as set forth in section 3 for the planning, engineering, environmental
remediation and reconstruction of fire station facilities within the city of Fall River; provided,
that funding shall include, but not limited to, the: (i) inspection and reinforcement of structural
elements, including foundations, support beams, walls, staircases and roofs; (ii) repair of ceiling
collapses, floor damage and other safety hazards; (iii) compliance with state and local building
codes, including fire safety and seismic standards; (iv) full removal and remediation of asbestos,
black mold, lead paint and other contaminants; (v) ventilation and filtration upgrades to ensure
long-term air quality and safety; (vi) modernization of HVAC, electrical and plumbing systems;
(vii) emergency lighting and sprinkler system upgrades; (viii) improvements to energy efficiency
and sustainability; (ix) decontamination of showers and equipment washing stations; (x)
firefighter-safe rest and recovery areas; (xi) accessible, gender-inclusive living and restroom
facilities; and (xii) enhanced emergency communication and dispatch infrastructure; and
provided further, that the program shall prioritize funding and construction to fire stations in the
city of Fall River that: (a) pose immediate structural safety risks; (b) contain known toxic
substances including, but not limited to, mold and asbestos; (c) are in violation of health or fire
codes; (d) lack appropriate decontamination or wellness facilities; and (e) demonstrate urgent
need based on age, condition or call volume..………..$15,000,000
SECTION 3. (a) For the purposes of this act, the following words shall, unless the
context clearly requires otherwise, have the following meanings:
of 3

“Department”, the department of fire services.
“Executive office”, the executive office for administration and finance.
“Program”, the Fall River fire station infrastructure and remediation improvement
program.
(b) The executive office, in consultation with the department and the department of
public health, shall establish and administer the Fall River fire station infrastructure and
remediation improvement program. The program shall ensure that all fire station facilities within
the city of Fall River are structurally sound, free from environmental hazards and adequately
equipped to support the health, safety and operational readiness of the city of Fall River fire
department.
(c) The department of public health shall oversee all environmental remediation work of
the program to ensure compliance with applicable health and safety standards. The department
shall provide oversight on structural repairs to ensure all improvements meet or exceed state and
local code requirements.
(d) The executive office, in conjunction with the department, the city of Fall River and
project contractors, shall submit an annual report, not later than December 31, on the program
established in this act that shall include: (i) detailing project timelines, expenditures, structural
evaluations and environmental remediation status of fire stations in the city of Fall River
participating in the program; and (ii) any recommendations for improvements to the program.
The annual report shall be submitted to the chairs of the joint committee on public safety and
homeland security; the chairs of the house and senate committees on ways and means; and the
clerks of the house of representatives and senate.
of 3